Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 14. Affiliated Transactions.

§ 13.1-725.
Definitions.

For purposes of this article:

An
“affiliate”
means a person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the person specified.

An
“affiliated transaction”
means any of the following transactions:

Any merger of the corporation or any of its subsidiaries with any interested shareholder or with any other corporation that immediately after the merger would be an affiliate of an interested shareholder that was an interested shareholder immediately before the merger;

Any share exchange pursuant to §

13.1-717

in which any interested shareholder acquires one or more classes or series of voting shares of the corporation or any of its subsidiaries;

Except for transactions in the ordinary course of business, (i) any sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, transfer or other disposition (in one transaction or a series of transactions) to or with any interested shareholder of any assets of the corporation or of any of its subsidiaries having an aggregate fair market value in excess of five percent of the corporation’s consolidated net worth as of the date of the corporation’s most recently available financial statements, or (ii) any guaranty by the corporation or any of its subsidiaries (in one transaction or a series of transactions) of indebtedness of any interested shareholder in an amount in excess of five percent of the corporation’s consolidated net worth as of the date of the corporation’s most recently available financial statements;

The sale or other disposition by the corporation or any of its subsidiaries to an interested shareholder (in one transaction or a series of transactions) of any voting shares of the corporation or any of its subsidiaries having an aggregate market value in excess of five percent of the aggregate market value of all outstanding voting shares of the corporation except pursuant to a share dividend or the exercise of rights or warrants distributed or offered on a basis affording substantially proportionate treatment to all holders of the same class or series of voting shares;

The dissolution, domestication, or conversion of the corporation if proposed by or on behalf of an interested shareholder; or

Any reclassification of securities, including any reverse stock split, or recapitalization of the corporation, or any merger of the corporation with any of its subsidiaries or any distribution or other transaction, whether or not with or into or otherwise involving an interested shareholder, which has the effect, directly or indirectly (in one transaction or a series of transactions), of increasing by more than five percent the percentage of the outstanding voting shares of the corporation or any of its subsidiaries beneficially owned by any interested shareholder.

The
“announcement date”
means the date of the first general public announcement of the proposed affiliated transaction or of the intention to propose an affiliated transaction or the date on which the proposed affiliated transaction or the intention to propose an affiliated transaction is first communicated generally to shareholders of the corporation, whichever is earlier.

An
“associate”
means as to any specified person:

A person is deemed to be a
“beneficial owner”
of voting shares as to which such person and such person’s affiliates and associates, individually or in the aggregate, have or share directly, or indirectly through any contract, arrangement, understanding, relationship, or otherwise:

“Control”
means the possession, directly or indirectly, through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, arrangement, understanding, relationship or otherwise, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person. The beneficial ownership of 10 percent or more of a corporation’s voting shares shall be deemed to constitute control.

The
“determination date”
means the date on which an interested shareholder became an interested shareholder.

Unless otherwise specified in the articles of incorporation initially filed with the Commission, for purposes of this article a “disinterested director” means as to any particular interested shareholder (i) any member of the board of directors of the corporation who was a member of the board of directors before the later of January 1, 1988, and the determination date and (ii) any member of the board of directors of the corporation who was recommended for election by, or was elected to fill a vacancy and received the affirmative vote of, a majority of the disinterested directors then on the board of directors.

“Fair market value”
means:

An
“interested shareholder”
means any person that is:

“Valuation date”
means, if the affiliated transaction is voted upon by shareholders, the day before the date of the vote of shareholders or, if the affiliated transaction is not voted upon by shareholders, the date of the consummation of the transaction.

“Voting shares”
means the outstanding shares of all classes or series of the corporation entitled to vote generally in the election of directors.

1.

Any entity, other than the corporation and any of its subsidiaries, of which such person is an officer, director, manager, or general partner or is the beneficial owner of 10 percent or more of any class of voting shares or other interests;

2.

Any trust or other estate in which such person has a substantial beneficial interest or as to which such person serves as trustee or in a similar fiduciary capacity; and

3.

Any relative or spouse of such person, or any relative of such spouse, who has the same home as such person or who is an officer or director of the corporation or any of its affiliates.

1.

Voting power, which includes the power to vote or to direct the voting of the voting shares, unless such power results solely from a revocable proxy given in response to a proxy solicitation made to more than 10 persons by way of a solicitation statement filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission and in accordance with the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934;

2.

Investment power, which includes the power to dispose or to direct the disposition of the voting shares; or

3.

The right to acquire voting power or investment power, whether such right is exercisable immediately or only after the passage of time, pursuant to any contract, arrangement, or understanding, upon the exercise of conversion rights, exchange rights, warrants, or options, or otherwise; provided, that (i) a person shall not be deemed to be a beneficial owner of voting shares tendered pursuant to a tender or exchange offer made by such person or such person’s affiliates or associates until such tendered voting shares are accepted for purchase or exchange, (ii) a member of a national securities exchange shall not be deemed to be a beneficial owner of shares held directly or indirectly by it on behalf of another person solely because such member is the record holder of such securities and, pursuant to the rules of such exchange may direct the vote of such shares, without instructions, on other than contested matters or matters that may affect substantially the rights or privileges of the holders of the shares to be voted but is otherwise precluded by the rules of such exchange from voting without instructions and (iii) a director of the corporation shall not be deemed to be a beneficial owner of voting shares beneficially owned by another director of the corporation solely by reason of actions undertaken by such persons in their capacity as directors of the corporation.

1.

In the case of shares, the highest closing sale price of a share quoted during the 30-day period immediately preceding the date in question on the composite tape for shares listed on the New York Stock Exchange, or, if such shares are not quoted on the composite tape on the New York Stock Exchange, on the principal United States securities exchange registered under the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934 on which such shares are listed, or, if such shares are not listed on any such exchange, the highest closing bid quotation with respect to a share during the 30-day period preceding the date in question on the NASDAQ stock market automated quotations system or any similar system then in general use, or, if no such quotations are available, the fair market value of a share on the date in question as determined by a majority of the disinterested directors; and

2.

In the case of property other than cash or shares, the fair market value of such property on the date in question as determined by a majority of the disinterested directors.

1.

The beneficial owner of more than 10 percent of any class of the outstanding voting shares of the corporation; however, the term “interested shareholder” shall not include the corporation or any of its subsidiaries, any savings, employee stock ownership, or other employee benefit plan of the corporation or any of its subsidiaries, or any fiduciary with respect to any such plan when acting in such capacity. For the purpose of determining whether a person is an interested shareholder, the number of voting shares deemed to be outstanding shall include shares deemed owned by the interested shareholder through application of subdivision 3 under the definition of “beneficial owner” but shall not include any other voting shares that may be issuable pursuant to any contract, arrangement, or understanding, upon the exercise of any conversion right, exchange right, warrant, or option, or otherwise; or

2.

An affiliate or associate of the corporation and at any time within the preceding three years was an interested shareholder of such corporation.

History.

1985, c. 522; 1988, c. 442; 2005, c. 765; 2010, c. 782; 2019, c. 734.

Editor’s note.

For the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, referred to above, see 15 U.S.C.S. § 78a et seq.

Acts 2019, c. 734, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 5 provides: “That until July 1, 2021, the term ‘conversion,’ when used in any provision of the first enactment of this act, shall be construed to mean ‘entity conversion.’ ”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in paragraph 1, under the definition of “associate,” inserted “manager” following “director,” and added “or other interests” to the end; inserted “for purposes of this article” in the definition of “disinterested director”; substituted “30-day” for “thirty-day” twice in paragraph 1 under the definition of “Fair market value”; substituted “any conversion right, exchange right, warrant, or option” for “conversion rights, exchange rights, warrants, or options” at the end of paragraph 1 under the definition of “interested shareholder”; deleted the definition of “Subsidiary”; and substituted “10 percent” for “ten percent” throughout the section.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782, in subdivision 4 of the definition of “affiliated transaction,” deleted “fair” preceding “market” twice and deleted “as of the determination date” preceding “except pursuant to.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in the definition for “affiliated transaction,” in subdivision 3, inserted “corporation’s” preceding “most recently” twice; in subdivision 5, inserted “domestication, or conversion” following “dissolution”; rewrote subdivision 1 of the definition of “beneficial owner,” which read: “Voting power, which includes the power to vote or to direct the voting of the voting shares, unless such power results solely from a revocable proxy given in response to a proxy solicitation made to 10 or more persons and in accordance with the Securities Exchange Act of 1934”; in subdivision 1 of the definition for “Fair market value,” inserted “federal” preceding “Securities,” and substituted “NASDAQ stock market” for “National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc.”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article, “The New Virginia Stock Corporation Act: A Primer,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 67 (1985).

For article, “Virginia’s ‘Affiliated Transactions’ Statute: Indulging Form Over Substance in Second Generation Takeover Legislation,” see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 489 (1987).

For 1987 survey of Virginia business and corporate law, see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 645 (1987).

For article, “The Political Economy of Takeover Statutes,” see 73 Va. L. Rev. 111 (1987).

For note, “The Constitutionality of Second Generation Take-over Statutes,” see 73 Va. L. Rev. 203 (1987).

For survey on business and corporate law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 491 (1989).

§ 13.1-725.1.
Affiliated transactions.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained in this chapter, except as provided in subsection B of §

13.1-727

, no corporation shall engage in any affiliated transaction with any interested shareholder for a period of three years following such interested shareholder’s determination date unless approved by the affirmative vote of a majority (but not less than two) of the disinterested directors and by the affirmative vote of the holders of two-thirds of the voting shares other than shares beneficially owned by the interested shareholder. A corporation may engage in an affiliated transaction with an interested shareholder beginning three years after such interested shareholder’s determination date, provided such transaction complies with the provisions of §

13.1-726

.

History.

1988, c. 442.

Law Review.

For survey on business and corporate law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 491 (1989).

§ 13.1-726.
Voting requirements for affiliated transactions.

Except as provided in §

13.1-727

and notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A of §

13.1-638

, in addition to any affirmative vote required by any other section of this Act or by the articles of incorporation, an affiliated transaction shall be approved by the affirmative vote of the holders of two-thirds of the voting shares other than shares beneficially owned by the interested shareholder.

History.

1985, c. 522; 1988, c. 442.

Law Review.

For article, “Virginia’s ‘Affiliated Transactions’ Statute: Indulging Form Over Substance in Second Generation Takeover Legislation,” see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 489 (1987).

For survey on business and corporate law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 491 (1989).

§ 13.1-726.1.
Determination by disinterested directors.

A majority of the disinterested directors shall have the power to determine for the purposes of this article:

Whether a person is an interested shareholder;

The number of voting shares beneficially owned by any person;

Whether a person is an affiliate or associate of another;

Whether the securities to be issued or transferred by the corporation or any of its subsidiaries to any interested shareholder have an aggregate fair market value equal to or greater than five percent of the aggregate fair market value of all of the outstanding voting shares of the corporation or any of its subsidiaries as of the determination date; and

Whether the assets or amount of indebtedness guaranteed that may be the subject of any affiliated transaction constitutes more than five percent of the consolidated net worth of the corporation.

History.

1988, c. 442.

§ 13.1-727.
Exceptions.

The voting requirements set forth in §

13.1-726

do not apply to a particular affiliated transaction if the conditions specified in either of the following subdivisions are met:

The affiliated transaction has been approved by a majority of the disinterested directors; or

In the affiliated transaction consideration will be paid to the holders of each class or series of voting shares and the following conditions will be met:

The aggregate amount of the cash and the fair market value as of the valuation date of consideration other than cash to be received per share by holders of each class or series of voting shares in such affiliated transaction is at least equal to the highest of the following:

If applicable, the highest per share price, including any brokerage commissions, transfer taxes, and soliciting dealers’ fees paid by the interested shareholder for any shares of such class or series acquired by it (i) within the two-year period immediately preceding the determination date or (ii) in the transaction in which it became an interested shareholder, whichever is higher, plus, in either case, interest compounded annually from the earliest date on which such highest per share acquisition price was paid, being the “share acquisition date,” through the date the affiliated transaction is effected at the rate for one-year United States Treasury obligations from time to time in effect, less the aggregate amount of any cash dividends paid, and the market value of any dividends paid other than in cash, per share of such class or series, since the share acquisition date, up to the amount of such interest;

The fair market value per share of such class or series on the announcement date or on the determination date, whichever is higher being the “measuring date,” plus, in either case, interest compounded annually from the measuring date through the date the affiliated transaction is effected at the rate for one-year United States Treasury obligations from time to time in effect, less the aggregate amount of any cash dividends paid, and the market value of any dividends paid other than in cash, per share of such class or series, since the measuring date, up to the amount of such interest;

If applicable, the price per share equal to the per share amount determined pursuant to subdivision 2 a (2), multiplied by the ratio of (i) the highest per share price including any brokerage commissions, transfer taxes and soliciting dealers’ fees paid by the interested shareholder for any shares of such class or series acquired by it within the two-year period immediately preceding the determination date to (ii) the fair market value per share of such class or series on the first day in such two-year period on which the interested shareholder acquired any shares of such class or series; and

If applicable, the highest preferential amount, if any, per share to which the holders of such class or series are entitled in the event of any voluntary or involuntary dissolution of the corporation;

The consideration to be received by holders of outstanding shares shall be in cash or in the same form as the interested shareholder has previously paid for shares of the same class or series and if the interested shareholder has paid for shares with varying forms of consideration, the form of the consideration will be either cash or the form used to acquire the largest number of shares of such class or series previously acquired by the interested shareholder;

During such portion of the three-year period preceding the announcement date that such interested shareholder has been an interested shareholder, except as approved by a majority of the disinterested directors:

During such portion of the three-year period preceding the announcement date that such interested shareholder has been an interested shareholder, except as approved by a majority of the disinterested directors, such interested shareholder shall not have received the benefit, directly or indirectly (except proportionately as a shareholder), of any loans, advances, guarantees, pledges, or other financial assistance or any tax credits or other tax advantages provided by the corporation, whether in anticipation of or in connection with such affiliated transaction or otherwise; and

Except as otherwise approved by a majority of the disinterested directors, a proxy or information statement describing the affiliated transaction and complying with the requirements of the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and the rules and regulations thereunder (or any subsequent provisions replacing such Act, rules, or regulations) is mailed to holders of voting shares of the corporation at least 25 days before the consummation of such affiliated transaction, whether or not such proxy or information statement is required to be mailed pursuant to such Act, rules, regulations, or subsequent provisions.

The provisions of this article do not apply to a particular affiliated transaction if the conditions specified in any one of the following subdivisions are met:

The affiliated transaction is with (i) an interested shareholder who has been an interested shareholder continuously or who would have been such but for the unilateral action of the corporation since the latest of (a) January 26, 1988, (b) the date the corporation first became subject to this article by virtue of its becoming a public corporation or having 300 shareholders of record, or (c) the date such person became an interested shareholder with the prior or contemporaneous approval of a majority of the disinterested directors, (ii) any person who becomes an interested shareholder as a result of acquiring shares from a person specified in (i) of this subdivision by gift, testamentary bequest or the laws of descent and distribution or in a transaction in which consideration was not exchanged and who continues thereafter to be an interested shareholder, or who would have so continued but for the unilateral action of the corporation, (iii) a person who became an interested shareholder inadvertently or as a result of the unilateral action of the corporation and who, as soon as practicable thereafter, divested beneficial ownership of sufficient shares so that such person ceased to be an interested shareholder, and who would not, at any time within the three-year period immediately preceding the announcement date have been an interested shareholder but for such inadvertency or the unilateral action of the corporation, or (iv) an interested shareholder whose acquisition of voting shares making such person an interested shareholder was approved by a majority of the disinterested directors prior to such shareholder’s determination date.

The corporation (i) is not a public corporation and (ii) does not have more than 300 shareholders of record, unless its loss of that status results from action taken by or on behalf of an interested shareholder or a transaction in which a person becomes an interested shareholder.

The corporation is an investment company registered under the federal Investment Company Act of 1940.

The corporation’s articles of incorporation initially filed with the Commission expressly provide that the corporation shall not be governed by this article and such provision in the articles of incorporation has not subsequently been amended to be eliminated.

The corporation, by action of its shareholders, adopts an amendment of its articles of incorporation or bylaws expressly electing not to be governed by this article, provided that, in addition to any other vote required by law, such amendment of the articles of incorporation or bylaws shall be approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the shares entitled to vote that are not beneficially owned by an interested shareholder. An amendment adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall not be effective until 18 months after the date such amendment was approved by the shareholders and shall not apply to any affiliated transaction between the corporation and any person who became an interested shareholder of such corporation on or prior to the date of such amendment. A bylaw amendment adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall not be further amended by the board of directors. In the event the articles of incorporation or bylaws are subsequently amended to eliminate a prior amendment electing not to be governed by this article, such subsequent amendment shall not restrict an affiliated transaction between the corporation and any person who became an interested shareholder at a time after such prior amendment became effective and who continued to be an interested shareholder immediately before and immediately after the adoption of such subsequent amendment, provided such person thereafter remains an interested shareholder continuously, or would have so remained but for the unilateral action of the corporation.

(1)

There shall have been no failure to declare and pay at the regular date therefor any full periodic dividends, whether or not cumulative, on any outstanding shares of the corporation;

(2)

There shall have been (i) no reduction in the annual rate of dividends paid on any class or series of voting shares, except as necessary to reflect any subdivision of the class or series, and (ii) an increase in such annual rate of dividends as necessary to reflect any reclassification, including any reverse stock split, recapitalization, reorganization, or similar transaction that has the effect of reducing the number of outstanding shares of the class or series; and

(3)

Such interested shareholder shall not have become the beneficial owner of any additional voting shares except as part of the transaction that results in such interested shareholder becoming an interested shareholder;

History.

1985, c. 522; 1988, c. 442; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

Editor’s note.

For the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, referred to above, see 15 U.S.C.S. § 78a et seq. For the Investment Company Act of 1940, referred to above, see 15 U.S.C.S. § 80a-1 et seq.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “that has the effect” for “which has the effect” in subdivision A 2 c (2) and A 2 c (3); substituted “25 days” for “twenty five days” in subdivision A 2 e; substituted “18 months” for “eighteen months” in the second sentence of subdivision B 5; and made other minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision A 2 a. (3), deleted “of this subsection” preceding “multiplied by”; in clause B 1 (i) (b), inserted “becoming a public corporation or” preceding “having 300”; in subdivision B 2, added clause (i) and the designation for clause (ii), and substituted “its loss of that status” for “the foregoing”; in subdivision B 3, inserted “federal” following “under the”; in subdivision B 4, added “and such provision in the articles of incorporation has not subsequently been amended to be eliminated” at the end; in subdivision B 5, inserted “beneficially” following “vote that are not”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article, “Virginia’s ‘Affiliated Transactions’ Statute: Indulging Form Over Substance in Second Generation Takeover Legislation,” see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 489 (1987).

For survey on business and corporate law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 491 (1989).

§ 13.1-727.1.
Nonexclusivity.

Except as expressly provided in this article, the provisions of this article shall not limit actions that may be taken, or require the taking of any action, by the board of directors or shareholders with respect to any potential change in control of the corporation. With respect to any action or any failure to act by the board of directors, the provisions of §

13.1-690

shall apply. In determining the best interests of the corporation, a director may consider the possibility that those interests may best be served by the continued independence of the corporation.

History.

1988, c. 442.

Law Review.

For article, “Doing Well While Doing Good: Reassessing the Scope of Directors’ Fiduciary Obligations in For-Profit Corporations with Non-Shareholder Beneficiaries,” see 59 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 409 (2002).

For article, “The State of State Antitakeover Law,” see 95 Va. L. Rev. 1973 (2009).

§ 13.1-728.
Repealed by Acts 1988, c. 442.